Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.525

Seattle University license plates.

"Seattle University license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork recognizing Seattle University.

[ 2014 c 6 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 6: See note following RCW 46.18.200.